Colorado statutes. TITLE 35 Agriculture
PART 1
GENERAL PROVISIONS

35-40-100.2. Definitions.

As used in this part 1, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Animal" means coyotes, foxes, bobcats, bears, mountain lions, wolves, beavers, muskrats, raccoons, opossums, and striped skunks and any animals identified by rule promulgated by the commissioner and approved by the parks and wildlife commission.

(1.5) "At risk" means any depredating animal species that has been designated by the parks and wildlife commission as endangered, threatened, or at risk after:

A scientific investigation by the division of parks and wildlife in the department of natural resources that is based on valid, sound, and objective data and analysis that substantiates such designation; and

Presentation of scientifically valid data, analysis, or commentary by the commissioner relating to depredating animals; and

Presentation of scientifically valid data, analysis, or commentary by objective professionals, mutually identified by the state agricultural commission and the parks and wildlife commission relating to depredating animals.

"Board" means the Colorado sheep and wool board.

"Commissioner" means the commissioner of agriculture.

"Depredating animal" means any animal, animals, or group of animals that pose a threat to an agricultural product or resource.

"Pose a threat" means the threat of causing economic loss by killing or damaging an agricultural product or resource or consuming stored agricultural products. A threat shall be presumed to be posed when damage has historically occurred, is occurring, or when it is necessary to prevent depredating animals from inflicting death or injury to livestock or damaging agricultural products or resources.

Source:

L. 89:

Entire section added, p. 1396, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 96:

Entire section amended, p. 294, § 2, effective April 12.

L. 2012:

(1), IP(1.5), and (1.5)(c) amended, (HB 12-1317), ch. 248, p. 1236, § 97, effective June 4.

35-40-101. Powers and duties of the commissioner - rules - agreements.

It is the duty of the commissioner to control depredating animals within the state of Colorado to reduce economic losses to agricultural products or resources, except as otherwise set forth in subsection (4) of this section. The commissioner has exclusive jurisdiction, as described in this article, over the control of depredating animals.

The commissioner may take such steps as are necessary to carry out this part 1, including:

Adopting rules for the control of depredating animals, in consultation with the parks and wildlife commission;

Establishing lethal and nonlethal methods of controlling depredating animals;

Allowing state employees and owners of agricultural products or resources and their families, employees, agents, and identified designees to control depredating animals. Any bears or mountain lions taken by identified designees shall remain the property of the state. The license requirements of section 33-6-107 (9), C.R.S., shall not apply to this article; except that the identified designee shall possess a small game or furbearer license.

Allowing nonlethal methods or preventive activities such as the use of guard dogs and scaring devices.

When promulgating rules for the control of depredating animals, the commissioner shall consider and encourage humane and effective methods of control.

With respect to controlling depredating animals of an at-risk species, the following applies:

The parks and wildlife commission must approve any rules concerning the taking of depredating animals of an at-risk species prior to the adoption of such rules by the commissioner.

The commissioner, when adopting or modifying rules, shall consider any reasonably workable alternative designed to minimize the direct effect on at-risk species.

The commissioner shall control depredating animals of an at-risk species only where damage is occurring.

The commissioner shall notify the division of parks and wildlife in the department of natural resources when controlling depredating animals of an at-risk species.

The state agricultural commission shall approve any rules necessary to carry out the provisions of this part 1 prior to their adoption by the commissioner.

The commissioner may enter into written agreements on behalf of the state with the United States to define such procedure in accordance with sections 35-40-101 to 35-40-106 as said commissioner shall deem advisable and proper for the purpose of cooperating with the United States in the control in this state of coyotes, wolves, mountain lions, bobcats, and other depredating animals. The commissioner may also enter into written agreements concerning the analysis of depredation.

The commissioner is authorized to enter into agreements with the division of parks and wildlife in the department of natural resources for assistance in carrying out this part 1, which assistance may include resources, including financial assistance, at the discretion of the parks and wildlife commission.

The commissioner shall contact and provide information to the parks and wildlife commission as said commission sets population levels and hunting permit numbers for predators in areas where there is depredation to agriculture.

The powers and duties vested in the commissioner by this article may be delegated to qualified employees of the department.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to preclude the division of parks and wildlife from issuing permits pursuant to section 33-3-106, C.R.S., for the taking of wildlife causing damage.

Source:

L. 35:

p. 926, § 1.

CSA:

C. 73, § 14.

L. 41:

p. 210, § 1.

CRS 53:

§ 8-7-1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 8-7-1.

L. 73:

p. 226, § 1.

L. 89:

Entire section amended, p. 1396, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 96:

Entire section amended, p. 295, § 3, effective April 12.

L. 2012:

IP(2), (2)(a), IP(4), (4)(a), (7), and (8) amended, (HB 12-1317), ch. 248, p. 1237, § 98, effective June 4.

35-40-102. Control of depredating animals.

To further promote the control of depredating animals, the organized and systematic plan for such control may be extended by cooperative agreements between any person including, but not limited to, counties, associations, or corporations on the one part and the commissioner and the United States, or either of them, on the other part.

Source:

L. 35:

p. 927, § 2.

CSA:

C. 73, § 15.

CRS 53:

§ 8-7-2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 8-7-2.

L. 73:

p. 226, § 2.

L. 89:

Entire section amended, p. 1397, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 96:

Entire section amended, p. 297, § 4, effective April 12.

35-40-103. Disbursements from fund. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 35:

p. 927, § 3.

CSA:

C. 73, § 16.

L. 37:

p. 591, § 1.

L. 39:

p. 399, § 1.

L. 41:

p. 210, § 2.

L. 43:

p. 265, § 1.

L. 45:

p. 139, § 1.

L. 47:

p. 474, § 1.

CRS 53:

§ 8-7-3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 8-7-3.

L. 73:

p. 227, § 3.

L. 2006:

Entire section repealed, p. 148, § 27, effective August 7.

35-40-104. Predatory animal control license fee on sheep - predatory animal fund.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 97, p. 180, § 7, effective March 31, 1997.)

to (5) Repealed.

Source:

L. 41:

p. 211, § 3.

CSA:

C. 73, § 16(1).

L. 43:

p. 265, § 2.

L. 45:

p. 139, § 2.

L. 47:

p. 474, § 2.

L. 49:

p. 435, § 1.

L. 52:

p. 116, § 1.

CRS 53:

§ 8-7-4.

L. 57:

p. 141,§ 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 8-7-4.

L. 67:

p. 93, § 1.

L. 83:

Entire section R&RE, p. 2075, § 1, effective October 7.

L. 89:

(2) amended, (3) R&RE, and (4) repealed, pp. 1397, 1402, §§ 4, 5, 11, effective July 1.

L. 97:

(1) to (3) amended, p. 180, § 7, effective March 31.

L. 2006:

(3) repealed and (5) added, p. 148, §§ 28, 29, effective August 7.

L. 2010:

(5) repealed, (HB 10-1422), ch. 419, p. 2120, § 170, effective August 11.

35-40-105. Furs, specimens to be sold. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 35:

p. 928, § 4.

CSA:

C. 73, § 17.

CRS 53:

§ 8-7-6.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 8-7-5.

L. 2006:

Entire section repealed, p. 148, § 30, effective August 7.

35-40-106. Hunters - how recommended.

All government hunters employed under sections 35-40-101 to 35-40-106 shall be employed by recommendation of local county livestock growers' associations.

Source:

L. 35:

p. 928, § 5.

CSA:

C. 73, § 18.

CRS 53:

§ 8-7-7.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 8-7-6.

35-40-107. Bounty on coyote, wolf. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 1893:

p. 68, § 1.

R.S. 08:

§ 419.

C.L.

§ 3243.

CSA:

C. 160, § 167.

CRS 53:

§ 8-7-8.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 8-7-7.

L. 2006:

Entire section repealed, p. 148, § 31, effective August 7.

35-40-108. Scalps produced, claimant. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 1893:

p. 68, § 2.

R.S. 08:

§ 420.

C.L.

§ 3244.

CSA:

C. 160, § 168.

CRS 53:

§ 8-7-9.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 8-7-8.

L. 2006:

Entire section repealed, p. 149, § 32, effective August 7.

35-40-109. Bounties paid by state. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 1893:

p. 69, § 3.

R.S. 08:

§ 421.

C.L.

§ 3245.

CSA:

C. 160, § 169.

CRS 53:

§ 8-7-10.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 8-7-9.

L. 2006:

Entire section repealed, p. 149, § 33, effective August 7.

35-40-110. Record of scalps delivered - warrant for payment. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 1893:

p. 69, § 4.

R.S. 08:

§ 422.

C.L.

§ 3246.

CSA:

C. 160, § 170.

CRS 53:

§ 8-7-11.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 8-7-10.

L. 2006:

Entire section repealed, p. 149, § 34, effective August 7.

35-40-111. Scalp taken out of state - penalty. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 1893:

p. 69, § 5.

R.S. 08:

§ 423.

C.L.

§ 3247.

CSA:

C. 160, § 171.

CRS 53:

§ 8-7-12.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 8-7-11.

L. 65:

p. 232, § 2.

L. 2006:

Entire section repealed, p. 149, § 35, effective August 7.

35-40-112. County treasurer to administer oath. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 1893:

p. 69, § 6.

R.S. 08:

§ 424.

C.L.

§ 3248.

CSA:

C. 160, § 172.

CRS 53:

§ 8-7-13.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 8-7-12.

L. 2006:

Entire section repealed, p. 149, § 36, effective August 7.

35-40-113. Permit system for poisoning of predators.

The commissioner, after hearing and after consideration of both the needs and concerns involved, shall adopt a permit system incorporating the policies and procedures developed by the commissioner in cooperation with the division of parks and wildlife, pursuant to which annual permits shall be issued for the use of poisons by livestock operators, owners, or their authorized agents, for the control of predatory animals on lands owned or leased by them from private parties, if the point of use is at least two hundred yards from the nearest property line or public right-of-way. Such permit system shall, as practicably and reasonably as possible, provide a balance between the need to control predators and the need for protection for human beings and other forms of life. Such permit system shall specify the type of information to be set forth in the application, including the substance or device to be used, the quantity thereof, and identification of the property where the use is desired. The permit shall similarly set forth such information and shall also set forth such instructions, conditions, and restrictions as may be appropriate in the circumstances, including posting of public notice that poisons are in use.

Source:

L. 71:

p. 601, § 6.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 8-7-26.

L. 89:

Entire section amended, p. 1397, § 6, effective July 1.

35-40-114. Acts constituting violation. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 89:

Entire section added, p. 1398, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 97:

Entire section repealed, p. 181, § 8, effective March 31.

35-40-115. Enforcement.

Repealed.

Repealed.

Repealed.

Whenever it appears to the commissioner, upon sufficient evidence satisfactory to the commissioner, that any person has engaged in or is about to engage in any act or practice constituting a violation of any provision of this part 1 or of any rule or of any order promulgated under this part 1, he may apply to any court of competent jurisdiction to temporarily or permanently restrain or enjoin the act or practice in question and to enforce compliance with this article or any rule or order under this article. In any such action, the commissioner shall not be required to plead or prove irreparable injury or the inadequacy of the remedy at law. Under no circumstances shall the court require the commissioner to post a bond.

Any person who violates any provision of this part 1 or any regulation made pursuant to this part 1 is subject to a civil penalty, as determined by the commissioner. The maximum penalty shall not exceed one thousand dollars per violation.

No civil penalty may be imposed unless the person charged was given notice and opportunity for a hearing pursuant to article 4 of title 24, C.R.S.

If the commissioner is unable to collect such civil penalty or if any person fails to pay all or a set portion of the civil penalty as determined by the commissioner, the commissioner may recover such amount plus costs and attorney fees by action in any court of competent jurisdiction.

Whenever the commissioner is found to have lacked substantial justification to impose a civil penalty, the person charged may recover his costs and attorney fees from the department of agriculture.

Moneys collected from any civil penalties under the provisions of this section shall be paid to the state treasurer, who shall credit the same to the general fund.

Before imposing any civil penalty, the commissioner may consider the effect of such penalty on the ability of the person charged to stay in business.

The commissioner shall have full authority to administer oaths and take statements, to issue subpoenas requiring the attendance of witnesses before him and the production of all books, memoranda, papers, and other documents, articles, or instruments, and to compel the disclosure by such witnesses of all facts known to them relative to the matters under investigation. Upon the failure or refusal of any witness to obey any subpoena, the commissioner may petition the district court, and, upon a proper showing, the court may enter an order compelling the witness to appear and testify or produce documentary evidence. Failure to obey such an order of the court shall be punishable as a contempt of court.

Source:

L. 89:

Entire section added, p. 1398, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 97:

(1) to (3) repealed, p. 181, § 9, effective March 31.

L. 2006:

(5)(e) amended, p. 150, § 37, effective August 7.